apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="perf_ref_do/ći__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="inf_ći+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>đ</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>đ</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>đoh</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đe</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đe</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đosmo</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đoste</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đoše</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>š</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_ao__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>šavši</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_tv_do/ći__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="inf_ći+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>đ</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>đ</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>đoh</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đe</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đe</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đosmo</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đoste</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>đoše</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>š</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_ao__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>đen</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>šavši</l><r>ći<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_iv_d/ati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ado</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>avši</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ad</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx_oh__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>at</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>avši</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_tv_prizn/ati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>avši</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imperf_tv_zn/ati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ado</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ajući</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
<!--       <e><p><l>ajući</l><r>ajući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> --><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_ref_zn/ati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>ado</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ajući</l><r>ati<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
<!--       <e><p><l>ajući</l><r>ajući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> --><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="razići"><i>razi</i><par n="perf_ref_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zaobići"><i>zaobi</i><par n="perf_tv_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dati"><i>d</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zadati"><i>zad</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="podati"><i>pod</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pridati"><i>prid</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="razdati"><i>razd</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izdati"><i>izd</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="predati"><i>pred</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prodati"><i>prod</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="odati"><i>od</i><par n="perf_tv_d/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="znati"><i>zn</i><par n="imperf_tv_zn/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="znati"><i>zn</i><par n="imperf_ref_zn/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saznati"><i>sazn</i><par n="perf_tv_prizn/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="doznati"><i>dozn</i><par n="perf_tv_prizn/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="priznati"><i>prizn</i><par n="perf_tv_prizn/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izračunati"><i>izračun</i><par n="perf_tv_prizn/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="proračunati"><i>proračun</i><par n="perf_tv_prizn/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naći"><i>na</i><par n="perf_tv_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naći"><i>na</i><par n="perf_ref_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="snaći"><i>sna</i><par n="perf_ref_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pronaći"><i>prona</i><par n="perf_tv_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pronaći"><i>prona</i><par n="perf_ref_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iznaći"><i>izna</i><par n="perf_tv_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="proći"><i>pro</i><par n="perf_tv_do/ći__vblex"/></e>
